Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3173.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1F of Chapter 164 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended in Paragraph 7 after the word "safety" by inserting the following sentence:-
"The Department is authorized and directed to limit energy delivery charges on retail
customers' bills to not more than 50 percent of supply charges."
of 1